Washington statutes.
RCW 43.46.045

Executive director—Employees.

The governor shall select a full time executive director from a list of three names submitted by the commission by September 1, 1988, and anytime thereafter that a vacancy occurs. The executive director shall receive no other salary and shall not be otherwise gainfully employed. Subject to the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW, the executive director may also employ such clerical and other assistants as may be reasonably required to carry out commission functions. The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.

[ 1988 c 81 s 23; 1985 c 317 s 5; 1967 ex.s. c 125 s 2.]